Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2291HV (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 548 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321H.3A Education program required 1 for certain recyclers. 2 1. Beginning January 1, 2027, a person shall not recycle 3 battery electric motor vehicles or plug-in hybrid electric 4 motor vehicles, as those terms are defined in section 321.116, 5 unless the person is an authorized vehicle recycler who 6 has successfully completed a vehicle high-voltage battery 7 safe handling and storage education program approved by the 8 department. An authorized vehicle recycler shall display a 9 program completion certificate next to the recyclerâs license 10 displayed as required by section 321H.5. 11 2. The department shall approve vehicle high-voltage 12 battery safe handling and storage education programs and such 13 programs shall award a program completion certificate to an 14 authorized vehicle recycler who successfully completes the 15 program. 16 3. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 17 to administer this section. 18